Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201681-1416
Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice; created; purpose.

There is hereby created the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice. The commission shall educate the community at large to the problems encountered by law enforcement authorities, promote respect for law and encourage community involvement in the administration of criminal justice. The commission shall be an agency of the state, and the exercise by the commission of the powers conferred by the provisions of sections 81-1415 to 81-1426.01 and 81-1429.03 shall be deemed to be an essential governmental function of the state.

Laws 1969, c. 774, § 2, p. 2932;

Laws 2015, LB605, § 85;

Laws 2016, LB843, § 4.
July 1, 2017